Massachusetts, session 194th, H3064.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 71A of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking out section
1, as so appearing, and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 1. The people of Massachusetts find and declare that:
(a) The United States of America and the commonwealth of Massachusetts, in respect of
multiculturalism, have established no official language. The people of the commonwealth
recognize that the first amendment of the Constitution of the United States, which has its roots in
the commonwealth, includes the freedom of expression of language. The vast majority of
Massachusetts’ residents can trace their ancestry to multilingual individuals who helped build the
commonwealth. While English remains the most commonly spoken language for science,
of 10

technology and international business, it is hereby acknowledged that multilingualism is a
tremendous asset for economic opportunity.
(b) All parents are eager to have their children become literate and biliterate, thereby
allowing them to fully participate in the American dream of economic advancement, honoring
their ancestry, and attaining social advancement.
(c) The government and the public schools of Massachusetts have a moral obligation and
a constitutional duty to provide all Massachusetts’ children, regardless of their ethnicity or
national origins, with the skills necessary to become productive members of our society. Of these
skills, literacy in multiple languages, according to leading education research, is among the most
important.
(d) The public schools of Massachusetts have done an inadequate job of educating many
multilingual children, requiring that they be placed in native language programs and not
providing evidenced based programmatic language instruction that accelerates learning while
honoring the assets of multilingual students.
(e) Multilingual children can easily acquire full fluency and literacy in multiple
languages, if their native language is viewed as a strength and skill to be improved upon as soon
as they enter school.
(f) Therefore it is resolved that: all children in Massachusetts’ public schools shall have
ample opportunities to acquire multiple languages as rapidly and effectively as possible.
SECTION 2. Said chapter 71A is hereby further amended by striking out section 10, as
so appearing, and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
of 10

Section 10. (a) Teachers and administrators assigned to a language acquisition program
shall be properly qualified under state law for the program type. The department shall establish
endorsements for educators who have completed coursework and field-based experience to
provide instruction within sheltered English immersion programs, 2–way immersion
programs, transitional bilingual programs and other programs that meet the requirements of this
chapter.
(b) A bilingual education endorsement shall be awarded to educators who meet all of the
following requirements:
(1) A passing score on a foreign language test acceptable to the department in the
relevant foreign language.
(2) Demonstration of the subject matter knowledge and skill requirements set forth in 603
CMR 7.14(3)(b), through either: (i) the successful completion of a department approved course
of study for providing bilingual education; or (ii) a passing score on a test acceptable to the
department.
(3) Completion of 75 hours of field-based experience in a pre-K through 12 dual
language education or 2-way immersion program, transitional bilingual education program or
other bilingual education setting. A program for the required 75 hours of field-based experience
may be supervised by either: (i) a department approved course of study for providing bilingual
education; or (ii) the pre-K through 12 school where the field-based experience is completed.
(c) Annually, not later than June 1, the department shall provide each district with a list of
all bilingual educators who have bilingual education endorsements pursuant to this section. Prior
of 10

to the beginning of each school year, districts, including charter schools shall verify that each of
the bilingual educators in a multilingual learner program is properly endorsed for that program.
(d) Notwithstanding any provision in this section to the contrary, the department shall
enter into reciprocity agreements with other states and territories of the United States that allows
teachers in other states and territories of the United States who hold that state or territory’s
equivalent of an endorsement to obtain an endorsement in the commonwealth without
needing to meet the requirements of this section. The department shall promulgate rules and
regulations necessary to carry out this subsection.
SECTION 3. Said chapter 71A is hereby amended by adding the following 2 section:-
Section 13. (a) The department shall establish licensure reciprocity agreements with other
states and territories of the United States aimed at increasing the number of bilingual educators
in Massachusetts. The department shall notify all other states and territories of the United States
of its intent to enter into licensure reciprocity agreements for bilingual educators.
(b) The department shall finalize licensure reciprocity agreements that align with the
departments goals of building a linguistically diverse educator workforce.
(c) There shall be a task force on the bilingual educator workforce in the commonwealth.
The task force shall consist of: (i) the secretary of education or a designee, who shall serve as
chair; (ii) a member of the board of higher education, appointed by the board; (iii) a member of
the board of elementary and secondary education, appointed by the board; (iv) the chairs of the
joint committee on education; (v) 1 current or past InSPIRED fellow of the inspired fellowship
to be appointed by the department elementary and secondary education; (vi) 1 member to be
of 10

appointed by Latinos for Education, Inc.; (vii) 1 member to be appointed by Multistate
Association for Bilingual Education-Northeast, Inc.; (viii) 1 member to be appointed by the
Massachusetts Association of School Superintendents, Inc. Urban Superintendents; (ix) 1
member to be appointed by Massachusetts Association of School Committees, Inc.; (x) 1
member to be appointed by the American Federation of Teachers Massachusetts; (xi) 1 member
to be appointed by the Massachusetts Teachers Association.
(d) The task force shall: (i) develop best practices and standards related to establishing
licensure reciprocity agreements with other states and territories of the United States aimed at
increasing the number of bilingual educators in Massachusetts; and (ii) recommend policies and
procedures to notify states and U.S territories of the intent to enter into licensure reciprocity
agreements for bilingual educators.
(e) Annually, not later than December 31, the department shall submit a report to the
clerks of the house of representatives and senate and the joint committee on education. The
report shall address the progress of the implementation of this section and shall develop a
publicly reported data dashboard to track the percentage of certified bilingual educators. The
report shall set a measurable goal to work towards by 2035 for the number of certified bilingual
educators throughout the commonwealth.
Section 14. (a) The department shall establish and administer a bilingual educator
incentive program that shall prioritize the recruitment and retention of racially, culturally,
ethnically and linguistically diverse educators consistent with chapter 132 of the acts of 2019 to
diversify the educator workforce. The bilingual educator incentive program shall prioritize
districts with the highest percentages of multilingual learners served and districts with the
of 10

greatest disparities in the parity between racially, culturally, ethnically and linguistically diverse
educators to students. Eligible participants for the bilingual educator incentive program shall
include, but not be limited to, paraprofessionals, teachers, school leaders and district
administrators. The criteria for eligibility shall be determined by an interactive process between
the department and the local school district.
100 (b) The bilingual educator incentive program shall provide educators who have obtained
101 the appropriate licensure or certification for a bilingual education program with an annual
102 stipend of $10,000. The program’s annual stipend shall only be available to educators
103 who working in an approved bilingual education program that is certified by the district and the
104 department.
105 (c) The bilingual educator incentive program shall provide eligible staff who are deemed
106 to be bilingual by a department approved process that is submitted by the district for an
107 additional $5,000 stipend.
108 (d) An additional $1,000 stipend shall be provided to bilingual educators who attain a
109 state seal of biliteracy from the department under 603 CMR 31.00.
110 (e) A 5 year stipend, valued at $1,000 annually, shall be provided to bilingual educator
111 who are graduates of a public school system in the commonwealth.
112 (f) All bilingual educator incentive program stipends, in this section, shall be paid for by
113 the Bilingual Educator Trust Fund pursuant to section 2BBBBBB of chapter 29 and shall count
114 as compensation for the purposes of retirement with the Massachusetts teacher’s retirement
115 system under chapter 32.
of 10

116 (g) A bilingual educator who completes 10 years of service in an approved bilingual
117 education program in the commonwealth, within the same school district, shall be eligible for
118 $30,000 in student loan and education debt repayment assistance paid for by the Bilingual
119 Education Trust Fund under section 2BBBBBB of chapter 29.
120 SECTION 4. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
121 section 2AAAAAA the following section:-
122 Section 2BBBBBB. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the
123 commonwealth a separate fund to be known as the Bilingual Education Trust Fund. The fund
124 shall be administered by the commissioner of elementary and secondary education. The
125 fund shall be used for: (i) providing financial assistance to school districts and public institutions
126 of higher education in support of the establishment and expansion of bilingual education
127 programs in the commonwealth; and (ii) funding the bilingual educator incentive program
128 established pursuant to section 14 of chapter 71A. The commissioner shall prioritize funding for
129 districts with the highest percentages of multilingual learners and with persistent gaps in
130 achievement for multilingual learners
131 (b) The fund shall be credited with:
132 (i) revenue from appropriations and other money authorized by the general court and
133 specifically designated to be credited to the fund;
134 (ii) funds from public and private sources such as gifts, grants and donations which shall
135 be considered a charitable contribution tax deduction under subparagraph (13) of paragraph (a)
136 of Part B of section 3 of chapter 62;
of 10

137 (iii) funds collected from the excise tax on the retail sale of marijuana or marijuana
138 products in accordance with section 2 of chapter 64N;
139 (iv) funds collected from the excise tax on sports wagering operators in accordance with
140 section 14 of chapter 23N; and
141 (v) interest earned on money in the fund. Amounts credited to the fund shall not be
142 subject to further appropriation and any money remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year
143 shall not revert to the General Fund.
144 (c) Annually, not later than October 1, the commissioner of elementary and secondary
145 education shall report to the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, the joint committee
146 on education and the house and senate committees on ways and means on the fund’s
147 activities. The report shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the source and amount of funds
148 received; (ii) the expenditures made from the fund and the purposes of such expenditures; (iii)
149 any anticipated remaining revenue from awards; and (vi) the number municipal K though 12
150 school districts and public institutions of higher education who received funding.
151 (d) The department of elementary and secondary education shall establish rules and
152 regulations that are necessary to implement this section and section 14 of chapter 71A.
153 SECTION 5. Subsection (a) of section 14 of chapter 23N of the General Laws, as
154 appearing in by section 5 of chapter 173 of the acts of 2022, is hereby amended by striking out
155 the first sentence and inserting in place thereof the following sentence:-
156 An excise is hereby imposed upon sports wagering operators in the commonwealth at the
157 rate of: (i) 15 per cent of the operator’s adjusted gross sports wagering receipts from the
of 10

158 operation of in-person sports wagering, with 5 per cent to be deposited into the Bilingual
159 Education Trust Fund established in section 2BBBBBB of chapter 29 and 10 per cent to be
160 deposited into the Sports Wagering Fund established in section 17; (ii) 20 per cent of the
161 operator's adjusted gross sports wagering receipts from the operation of sports wagering through
162 mobile applications and other digital platforms approved by the commission, with 5 per cent to
163 be deposited into the Bilingual Education Trust Fund established in said section 2BBBBBB of
164 said chapter 29 and 15 per cent to be deposited into the Sports Wagering Fund established in said
165 section 17; and (iii) 15 per cent of the adjusted gross fantasy wagering receipts of a person or
166 entity that offers fantasy contests, as defined in section 11M1/2, with 5 per cent to be deposited
167 into the Bilingual Education Trust Fund established in said section 2BBBBBB of said chapter 29
168 and 10 per cent to be deposited into the Sports Wagering Fund established in said section 17.
169 SECTION 6. Chapter 64N of the General Laws is hereby by amended by striking out
170 section 2, as amended by section 5 of chapter 180 of the acts of 2022, and inserting in place
171 thereof the following section:-
172 Section 2. (a) An excise tax is hereby imposed upon the sale of marijuana or marijuana
173 products by a marijuana retailer to anyone other than a marijuana establishment at a rate of 10.75
174 per cent of the total sales price received by the marijuana retailer as a consideration for the sale
175 of marijuana or marijuana products. The excise tax shall be levied in addition to state tax
176 imposed upon the sale of property or services as provided in section 2 of chapter 64H and shall
177 be paid by a marijuana retailer to the commissioner at the time provided for filing the return
178 required by section 16 of chapter 62C.
of 10

179 (b) Two per cent of the excise tax rate imposed pursuant to the previous paragraph shall
180 be collected and deposited into the Bilingual Education Trust Fund established in section
181 2BBBBBB of chapter 29 and the remaining 8.75 per cent shall be collected and deposited
182 pursuant to section 5.
183 SECTION 7. Section 5 of said chapter 64N is hereby amended by inserting after the
184 words “than revenue”, in lines 2 and 3, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, the following
185 words:- deposited into the Bilingual Education Trust Fund pursuant to subsection (b) of section 2
186 and revenue.
187 SECTION 8 This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
of 10